New York, session 2025-2026, A11364.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of section 11.00 of the local finance law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 111 to read as follows: 3 111. Payments by the village of Hempstead, county of Nassau, made on 4 or after April first, two thousand twenty-six to employees upon sepa- 5 ration from employment, as may be approved by such village and includ- 6 ing, but not limited to, cash payment for separation incentives and/or 7 payment of the monetary value of accrued and accumulated but unused and 8 unpaid sick leave, vacation time, and any other forms of payment 9 required to be paid to such employees upon separation from employment, 10 twenty years. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15694-05-6